Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202017-142
Streets; moving of buildings; other obstructions; regulation.

A city of the second class shall have the power to regulate and prevent the moving of buildings through the streets and to regulate and prohibit the piling of building material or any excavation or obstruction of the streets.

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 197;

R.S.1913, § 5036;

C.S.1922, § 4205;

C.S.1929, § 17-144;

R.S.1943, § 17-142;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 34.